Alabama, session 2026rs, HB274.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 13A-7-94.1 is added to the Code of
Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
§13A-7-94.1
(a) The Department of Corrections may take reasonable
and necessary measures against an unmanned aircraft system
operating in violation of this article, including, but not
limited to, all of the following measures:
(1) Jamming, to the extent consistent with federal law
and regulations, including those of the Federal Communications
Commission.
(2) Hacking.
(3) Physical capture.
(4) Any other reasonable mitigation measure undertaken
to neutralize, intercept, disable, or disrupt an unmanned
aircraft system.
(b) This section shall not be construed to eliminate,
alter, or otherwise modify any other immunity or defense
available to the Department of Corrections or its officers,
employees, or agents established by law.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on June 1,
Page 1

Section 2. This act shall become effective on June 1,
HB274 Enrolled
2026.
Page 2

2026.
HB274 Enrolled









________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House as amended, 05-Feb-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 26-Feb-26 Passed



Page 3